foma/verbs.foma
read lexc /Users/david/Documents/git/akkadian-morph-analyzer/foma/verbs.lex
define VerbLexicon ;

! fill out the rest of the root consonants
define Double r -> "rr"  || _ "^" R3 ?* "+G+Dur";

! fill out the rest of the vowels
define Double [..] -> i  || _ "^" R2 ?* "i" "^" V1 ?* "+G+Imp";

define Cleanup [R1|R2|R3|R4|V1|"^"] -> 0 ;

define Grammar VerbLexicon .o. Double .o. Cleanup;
regex Grammar ;
